Louisiana, session 2026, HB247.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:2740.70.11 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2740.70.11. Allen Parish Economic Development District
A. There is hereby created within the parish of Allen, as more specifically
provided in Subsection B of this Section, a body politic and corporate which shall
be known as the Allen Parish Economic Development District, referred to in this
Section as the "district". The district shall be a political subdivision of the state as
defined in the Constitution of Louisiana.
B. The boundaries of the district shall encompass all of the territorial
jurisdiction of the parish of Allen.
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 247 ENROLLED
C. The district is created to provide for cooperative economic and
community development among the district, the parish, the state, and the owners of
property in the district; to provide for tourism-related initiatives; to enhance the
development of and improvement to the property within the area of the district; to
develop stable and more extensive employment opportunities; to improve
infrastructure; and to promote the overall welfare of the citizens of the district.
D.(1) In order to provide for the orderly development of the district and
effect the purposes of the district, the district shall be administered and governed by
a board of commissioners, referred to in this Section as the "board", composed of
five members as follows:
(a) The president of the Allen Parish Industrial Development Board.
(b) The president of the Oakdale Chamber of Commerce.
(c) The president of the Kinder Chamber of Commerce.
(d) The president of the governing authority of the parish of Allen.
(e) The member of the Louisiana House of Representatives whose district
encompasses all or the greater portion of the area of the district, or his designee.
(2) The members of the board shall serve during their terms of office. Any
designee shall serve at the pleasure of the designating authority.
(3) The board shall elect from its members a president, a vice president, a
secretary, a treasurer, and such other officers as it may deem necessary. The duties
of the officers shall be fixed by the bylaws adopted by the board.
(4) The minute books and archives of the district shall be maintained by the
secretary of the board. The monies, funds, and accounts of the district shall be in the
official custody of the board.
(5) The board shall adopt such rules and regulations as it deems necessary
or advisable for conducting its business affairs. It shall hold regular meetings as
shall be provided for in the bylaws and may hold special meetings at such times and
places within the district as may be prescribed in the bylaws.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 247 ENROLLED
(6) A majority of the voting members of the board shall constitute a quorum
for the transaction of business. The board shall keep minutes of all meetings and
shall make them available through the secretary of the board to residents of the
district.
(7) The members of the board shall serve without compensation; however,
they may be reimbursed for expenses incurred while attending to the business of the
board or the district.
E.(1) The district, acting by and through its board, shall have and exercise
all powers of a political subdivision necessary or convenient for carrying out its
objects and purposes, including but not limited to the following:
(a) To sue and to be sued.
(b) To adopt, use, and alter at will a corporate seal.
(c) To adopt bylaws and rules and regulations.
(d) To receive by gift, grant, or donation any sum of money, property, aid,
or assistance from the United States, the state of Louisiana, or any political
subdivision thereof, or any person, firm, or corporation.
(e) To enter into contracts, agreements, or cooperative endeavors with the
state and its political subdivisions or political corporations and with any public or
private association, corporation, business entity, or individual.
(f) To appoint officers, agents, and employees; prescribe their duties; and
fix their compensation.
(g) To acquire by purchase, gift, grant, donation, or lease property as may
be necessary or desirable for carrying out the objectives and purposes of the board.
(h) To perform any other necessary and ancillary acts to effectuate its
functions, to perform its duties, or to give effect to its powers in accordance with this
Section.
(2) The board shall not exercise any power, except the power to levy a
occupancy tax as authorized in this Section, without the approval of the governing
authority of the parish of Allen.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 247 ENROLLED
F.(1) The district may levy and collect a tax upon the paid occupancy of
hotel rooms and overnight camping facilities located within the district. The
occupancy tax shall not exceed three percent of the rent or fee charged for such
occupancy.
(2)(a) The term "hotel" as used in this Section shall have the same definition
as that contained in R.S. 47:301(6).
(b) The term "overnight camping facility" as used in this Section shall mean
any commercial establishment providing space and utilities in order to accommodate
recreational vehicles on a temporary, overnight basis.
(3) The person who exercises or is entitled to occupancy of the hotel room
or overnight camping facility shall pay the occupancy tax at the time the rent or fee
for occupancy is paid. "Person" as used in this Paragraph shall have the same
definition as that contained in R.S. 47:301(8).
(4) The occupancy tax shall be in addition to all taxes levied upon the
occupancy of hotel rooms and overnight camping facilities located within the city.
(5) The district may enter into a contract with any public entity authorized
to collect sales or use taxes, under terms and conditions it considers appropriate,
including payment of a reasonable collection fee for the collection of the occupancy
tax authorized in this Subsection.
(6) Any monies received by the district shall be used exclusively for the
benefit of the district.
G.(1) The board shall prepare or cause to be prepared a plan or plans
specifying the public improvements, facilities, and services proposed to be furnished,
constructed, or acquired for the district and shall conduct public hearings, publish
notice with respect thereto, and disseminate information as it, in the exercise of its
sound discretion, deems appropriate or advisable and in the public interest.
(2) Any plan may specify and encompass any public services, capital
improvements, and facilities which the parish of Allen is authorized to undertake,
furnish, or provide under the constitution and laws of the state of Louisiana, and the
specified public services, improvements, and facilities shall be special and in
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 247 ENROLLED
addition to all services, improvements, and facilities which the parish is then
furnishing or providing or may then or in the future be obligated to furnish or
provide within the district.
(3) Any plan shall include an estimate of the annual and total cost of
acquiring, constructing, or providing the services, improvements, or facilities set
forth therein.
H.(1) The board shall adopt an annual budget in accordance with the
Louisiana Local Government Budget Act, R.S. 39:1301 et seq.
(2) The district shall be subject to audit by the legislative auditor pursuant
to R.S. 24:513.
I. All state officers and agencies are authorized at their discretion to render
such services to the district within their respective functions as may be requested by
the district. In addition, the district and such agencies are authorized to enter into
such contracts, cooperative endeavor agreements, or other agreements necessary or
convenient to carry out the purposes of this Section.
Section 2. R.S. 33:4574(B)(3), 4574.1.1(A)(3), and 4574.14 are hereby repealed in
their entirety.
Section 3. All remaining funds and property of the Allen Parish Tourist Commission
shall be transferred to the Allen Parish Economic Development District. The funds shall be
held in a separate account and shall be used for the purpose of attracting conventions and
tourists into the area and former jurisdiction of the commission.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.